Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5272.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 Sec. 522. (1) The amount of a claim made pursuant to under this chapter shall be is determined as follows: (a) A claimant who is not a senior citizen is entitled to a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 credit against the state income tax liability under this part equal to 60% of the amount by which the property taxes on the homestead, or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year, exceeds 3.5% of the claimant's total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of the claimant's total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (b) A claimant who is a senior citizen is entitled to a credit against the state income tax liability under this part equal to the following: (i) For a claimant with total household resources of $21,000.00 or less, an amount as determined in accordance with subdivision (c). (ii) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $21,000.00 and less than or equal to $22,000.00, an amount equal to 96% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (iii) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $22,000.00 and less than or equal to $23,000.00, an amount equal to 92% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (iv) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $23,000.00 and less than or equal to $24,000.00, an amount equal to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 88% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (v) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $24,000.00 and less than or equal to $25,000.00, an amount equal to 84% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (vi) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $25,000.00 and less than or equal to $26,000.00, an amount equal to 80% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (vii) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $26,000.00 and less than or equal to $27,000.00, an amount equal to 76% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (viii) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $27,000.00 and less than or equal to $28,000.00, an amount equal to 72% of the difference between the property taxes on the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (ix) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $28,000.00 and less than or equal to $29,000.00, an amount equal to 68% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (x) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $29,000.00 and less than or equal to $30,000.00, an amount equal to 64% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (xi) For a claimant with total household resources of more than $30,000.00, an amount equal to 60% of the difference between the property taxes on the homestead or the credit for rental of the homestead for the tax year and 3.5% of total household resources for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 3.2% of total household resources for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018.tax year. (c) A claimant who is a senior citizen with total household resources of $21,000.00 or less, or who is a paraplegic, hemiplegic, or quadriplegic, and for tax years that begin after December 31, 1999, a claimant or who is totally and permanently 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 disabled, deaf, or , for tax years that begin after December 31, 2012, blind is entitled to a credit against the state income tax liability for the amount by which the property taxes on the homestead, the credit for rental of the homestead, or a service charge in lieu of ad valorem taxes as provided by section 15a of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1415a, for the tax year exceeds the percentage of the claimant's total household resources for that tax year computed as follows: Total household resources Percentage Not over $3,000.00 .0% Over $3,000.00 but not over $4,000.00 1.0% Over $4,000.00 but not over $5,000.00 2.0% Over $5,000.00 but not over $6,000.00 3.0% Over $6,000.00 for tax years before the 2018 tax year 3.5% Over $6,000.00 for tax years after the 2017 tax year 3.2% (d) A claimant who is an eligible serviceperson, eligible veteran, or eligible widow or widower is entitled to a credit against the state income tax liability for a percentage of the property taxes on the homestead for the tax year not in excess of 100% determined as follows: (i) Divide the taxable value allowance specified in section 506 by the taxable value of the homestead or, if the eligible serviceperson, eligible veteran, or eligible widow or widower 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 leases or rents a homestead, divide 20% of the total annual rent paid for tax years before the 2018 tax year or 23% of the total annual rent paid for tax years after the 2017 the tax year on the property by the property tax rate on the property. (ii) Multiply the property taxes on the homestead by the percentage computed in subparagraph (i). (e) A claimant who is blind is entitled to a credit against the state income tax liability for a percentage of the property taxes on the homestead for the tax year determined as follows: (i) If the taxable value of the homestead is $3,500.00 or less, 100% of the property taxes. (ii) If the taxable value of the homestead is more than $3,500.00, the percentage that $3,500.00 bears to the taxable value of the homestead. (f) Except as otherwise provided under this subdivision, for tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2026, a claimant who is a disabled veteran or a widow or widower of a disabled veteran who leases or rents a homestead is entitled to a credit against the state income tax liability under this part equal to 23% of the gross rent paid during the tax year, or if that homestead is subject to a service charge in lieu of ad valorem taxes as provided by section 15a of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1415a, equal to 10% of the gross rent paid during the tax year. However, if the claimant has documentation that the claimant's homestead is subject to a service charge of more than 10%, the claimant is entitled to a credit equal to that higher percentage of the gross rent paid during the tax year. (2) A person claimant who is qualified to make a claim under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 more than 1 classification shall elect the classification under which the claim is made. (3) Only 1 claimant per household for a tax year is entitled to the credit, unless both the husband and wife spouses filing a joint return are blind, then each shall be is considered a claimant. (4) As used in this section, "totally and permanently disabled" means disability as defined in section 216 of title II 416 of the social security act, 42 USC 416. (5) A senior citizen who has total household resources for the tax year of $6,000.00 or less and who for 1973 received a senior citizen homestead exemption under former section 7c of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, may compute the credit against the state income tax liability for a percentage of the property taxes on the homestead for the tax year determined as follows: (a) If the taxable value of the homestead is $2,500.00 or less, 100% of the property taxes. (b) If the taxable value of the homestead is more than $2,500.00, the percentage that $2,500.00 bears to the taxable value of the homestead. (6) For a return of less than 12 months, the claim shall must be reduced proportionately. (7) The department may prescribe tables that may be used to determine the amount of the claim. (8) The total credit allowed in this section for each year shall must not exceed the amount determined under section 520. (9) The total credit allowable under this part and part 361 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36101 to 324.36117, shall 324.36116, must not exceed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the total property tax due and payable by the claimant in that year. The amount by which the credit exceeds the property tax due and payable shall must be deducted from the credit claimed under part 361 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36101 to 324.36117.324.36116. Sec. 530. (1) The department may require reasonable proof from the claimant in support of rent paid, property taxes paid, total household resources, size and nature of the property claimed as a homestead, percentage of service charge claimed if higher than 10%, or any other information required for the administration of this chapter. (2) If a homestead is occupied for less than a 12-month period, the credit computation shall must be proportional to the period of occupancy. A claimant shall not occupy more than 1 homestead at 1 time. If more than 1 homestead is occupied during the tax year, the credit computation shall must be proportional to the period of occupancy of each homestead, but not for a total period of more than 1 year. (3) If unoccupied land is used for agricultural or horticultural purposes by the claimant, the credit shall be is allowed only if the gross receipts of the agricultural or horticultural operations exceed the total household resources as defined in this part. (4) A claim shall not be is not allowed if the department finds that the claimant received title to the homestead primarily for the purpose of receiving benefits under this chapter. (5) The amount of a claim otherwise payable may be applied by the department against a liability outstanding on the books of the state against the claimant. 1 2 3 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00708'25) or House Bill No. 5275(request no. H00708'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.